Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 1. Offenses Relating to Controlled Substances.

Cross references. —

For official laboratory reports in prosecutions under this article, see AS

12.45.084

.

Sec. 11.71.010.
Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first degree.

Except as authorized in AS 17.30, a person commits the crime of misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first degree if the person

delivers any amount of a schedule IA controlled substance to a person under 19 years of age who is at least three years younger than the person delivering the substance;

delivers any amount of a schedule IIA or IIIA controlled substance to a person under 19 years of age who is at least three years younger than the person delivering the substance; or

engages in a continuing criminal enterprise.

For purposes of this section, a person is engaged in a “continuing criminal enterprise” if

the person commits a violation of this chapter which is punishable as a felony; and

that violation is a part of a continuing series of five or more violations of this chapter

which the person undertakes in concert with at least five other persons organized, supervised, or otherwise managed by the person; and

from which the person obtains substantial income or resources.

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first degree is an unclassified felony and is punishable as provided in AS 12.55.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Misconduct involving a controlled substance — AS

11.71.020

—

11.71.070

Schedules IA — IIIA substances — AS

11.71.140

— .160

Excluded defenses — AS

11.71.320

Definition of “deliver” — AS

11.71.900

(6)

Imitation controlled substances — AS 11.73

Original Code Provision — AS17.10.010; AS 17.10.200; AS 17.12.010; AS 17.12.110; AS 17.10.170.

For construction of statutes with respect to culpability, see AS

11.81.610

. For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(b)

for unclassified felonies and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.71.020.
Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the second degree.

History.

[Repealed, § 179 ch 36 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 11.71.021.
Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the second degree.

Except as authorized in AS 17.30, a person commits the crime of misconduct involving a controlled substance in the second degree if the person

manufactures or delivers any amount of a schedule IA controlled substance or possesses any amount of a schedule IA controlled substance with intent to manufacture or deliver;

manufactures any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains

methamphetamine, or its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers; or

an immediate precursor of methamphetamine, or its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;

possesses an immediate precursor of methamphetamine, or the salts, isomers, or salts of isomers of the immediate precursor of methamphetamine, with the intent to manufacture any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains methamphetamine, or its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;

possesses a listed chemical with intent to manufacture any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains

methamphetamine, or its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers; or

an immediate precursor of methamphetamine, or its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;

possesses methamphetamine in an organic solution with intent to extract from it methamphetamine, or its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers; or

under circumstances not proscribed under AS

11.71.010(a)(2)

, delivers

an immediate precursor of methamphetamine, or the salts, isomers, or salts of isomers of the immediate precursor of methamphetamine, to another person with reckless disregard that the precursor will be used to manufacture any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains methamphetamine, or its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers; or

a listed chemical to another person with reckless disregard that the listed chemical will be used to manufacture any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains

methamphetamine, or its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;

an immediate precursor of methamphetamine, or its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers; or

methamphetamine, or its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers in an organic solution.

In a prosecution under (a) of this section, possession of more than six grams of the listed chemicals ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or the salts, isomers, or salts of isomers of those chemicals is prima facie evidence that the person intended to use the listed chemicals to manufacture, to aid or abet another person to manufacture, or to deliver to another person who intends to manufacture methamphetamine, its immediate precursors, or the salts, isomers, or salts of isomers of methamphetamine or its immediate precursors. The prima facie evidence described in this subsection does not apply to a person who possesses

the listed chemicals ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or the salts, isomers, or salts of isomers of those chemicals

and the listed chemical was dispensed to the person under a valid prescription; or

in the ordinary course of a legitimate business, or an employee of a legitimate business, as a

retailer or as a wholesaler;

wholesale drug distributor licensed by the Board of Pharmacy;

manufacturer of drug products licensed by the Board of Pharmacy;

pharmacist licensed by the Board of Pharmacy; or

health care professional licensed by the state; or

less than 24 grams of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or the salts, isomers, or salts of isomers of those chemicals, kept in a locked storage area on the premises of a legitimate business or nonprofit organization operating a camp, lodge, school, day care center, treatment center, or other organized group activity, and the location or nature of the activity, or the age of the participants, makes it impractical for the participants in the activity to obtain medicinal products.

In this section, “listed chemical” means a chemical described under AS

11.71.200

.

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the second degree is a class A felony.

History.

(§ 48 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(c)

for class A felonies and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effective dates. —

Section 150, ch. 4, FSSLA 2019 makes this section effective July 1, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.71.030.
Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the third degree.

Except as authorized in AS 17.30, a person commits the crime of misconduct involving a controlled substance in the third degree if the person

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

delivers any amount of a schedule IVA, VA, or VIA controlled substance to a person under 19 years of age who is at least three years younger than the person delivering the substance;

possesses any amount of a schedule IA or IIA controlled substance

with reckless disregard that the possession occurs

on or within 500 feet of school grounds; or

at or within 500 feet of a recreation or youth center; or

on a school bus;

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

under circumstances not proscribed under AS

11.71.021(a)(2)

— (6), manufactures or delivers any amount of a schedule IIA or IIIA controlled substance or possesses any amount of a schedule IIA or IIIA controlled substance with intent to manufacture or deliver.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under (a)(3)(A) of this section that the prohibited conduct took place entirely within a private residence located within 500 feet of the school grounds or recreation or youth center, and that the prohibited conduct did not involve distributing, dispensing, or possessing with the intent to distribute or dispense a controlled substance for profit. Nothing in this subsection precludes a prosecution under any other provision of this section or any other section of this chapter.

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the third degree is a class B felony.

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 8 ch 146 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 63 SLA 1991; am §§ 1, 2 ch 70 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 73 SLA 2000; am § 6 ch 53 SLA 2006; am §§
42 — 44 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§
49, 50, 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intent” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “possess,” “affirmative defense” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “manufacture,” “deliver” — AS

11.71.900

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first through seventh degree — AS

11.71.010

—

11.71.070

Schedules of controlled substances — AS

11.71.140

—

11.71.190

Excluded defenses — AS

11.71.320

Imitation controlled substances — AS 11.73

Original Code Provision — AS 17.10; AS 17.12.

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(a)(27), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as (d); relettered in 2016, at which time former subsection (c) was relettered as (d).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “second” for “third”; in (a)(1), deleted “under circumstances not proscribed under AS

11.71.020

(2 — 6),” at the beginning of the paragraph; deleted “any amount of a Schedule IIA or IIIA controlled substance” in two places; added (a)(1)(A — D); added (a)(4 — 8); in (c) [now (d)], substituted “second” for “third”; added (d) [now (c)] and (e); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (a), substituted “third degree” for “second degree” in the introductory paragraph, repealed (a)(1), (a)(4), (a)(5),(a)(6), (a)(7), (a)(8), and added (a)(9); repealed (c);
substituted “third degree” for “second degree” in (d); repealed (e).

Editor's notes. —

Section 22, ch. 53, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendment of paragraph (a)(1) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after June 3, 2006.”

Section 142(a), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments of (a) and (d) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.71.040.
Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the fourth degree.

Except as authorized in AS 17.30 and AS 17.38, a person commits the crime of misconduct involving a controlled substance in the fourth degree if the person

manufactures or delivers any amount of a schedule IVA or VA controlled substance or possesses any amount of a schedule IVA or VA controlled substance with intent to manufacture or deliver;

manufactures or delivers, or possesses with the intent to manufacture or deliver, one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances of an aggregate weight of one ounce or more containing a schedule VIA controlled substance;

possesses any amount of a schedule IA controlled substance listed in AS

11.71.140(e)

;

possesses a schedule IIIA, IVA, VA, or VIA controlled substance

with reckless disregard that the possession occurs

on or within 500 feet of school grounds; or

at or within 500 feet of a recreation or youth center; or

on a school bus;

knowingly keeps or maintains any store, shop, warehouse, dwelling, building, vehicle, boat, aircraft, or other structure or place that is used for keeping or distributing controlled substances in violation of a felony offense under this chapter or AS 17.30;

makes, delivers, or possesses a punch, die, plate, stone, or other thing that prints, imprints, or reproduces a trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, or device of another or any likeness of any of these on a drug, drug container, or labeling so as to render the drug a counterfeit substance;

knowingly uses in the course of the manufacture or distribution of a controlled substance a registration number that is fictitious, revoked, suspended, or issued to another person;

knowingly furnishes false or fraudulent information in or omits material information from any application, report, record, or other document required to be kept or filed under AS 17.30;

obtains possession of a controlled substance by misrepresentation, fraud, forgery, deception, or subterfuge;

affixes a false or forged label to a package or other container containing any controlled substance;

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

violates AS

11.71.050(a)(4)

and, within the preceding 10 years, has been previously convicted of a crime under AS

11.71.050(a)(4)

, or a law or ordinance in this or another jurisdiction with elements similar to AS 11.71.050(a)(4).

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under (a)(4)(A) of this section that the prohibited conduct took place entirely within a private residence located within 500 feet of the school grounds or recreation or youth center. Nothing in this subsection precludes a prosecution under any other provision of this section or any other section of this chapter.

Nothing in (a)(5) or (6) of this section precludes a prosecution or civil proceeding brought under any other provision of this section or any other section of this chapter or under AS 17.

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the fourth degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 9 ch 146 SLA 1986; am §§ 3, 4 ch 63 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 53 SLA 1994; am §§ 3, 4 ch 70 SLA 1994; am § 7 ch 53 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 2011; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 2012; am §§
45, 46, 179 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§
51, 52, 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intent,” “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “deception,” “possess,” “building” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “manufacture,” “deliver,” “marijuana,” “counterfeit substance,” “drug” — AS

11.71.900

Forgery — AS

11.46.500

—

11.56.510

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first through seventh degree — AS

11.71.010

—

11.71.070

Aggregate weight of marijuana — AS

11.71.080

Schedules of controlled substances — AS

11.71.140

—

11.71.190

Excluded defenses — AS

11.71.320

Offenses defined by amounts — AS

11.71.340

Imitation controlled substances — AS 11.73

Original Code Provision — AS 17.10; AS 17.12.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2016, former sub-subparagraph (a)(3)(A)(ii) and former subparagraphs (a)(3)(B) — (G) were repealed and subparagraph (a)(3)(A)(i) was amended by secs. 45 and 179, ch. 36, SLA 2016. The resulting language of subparagraph (a)(3)(A)(i) was renumbered as paragraph (a)(3).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “third” for “fourth”; rewrote (a)(3), added (a)(11); in (d), substituted “third” for “fourth”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (a), inserted “and AS 17.38” and substituted “fourth degree” for “third degree” in the introductory paragraph, repealed (a)(11), added (a)(12), and made related stylistic changes; and substituted “fourth degree” for “third degree” in (d).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 22, ch. 53, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendment of subparagraph (a)(3)(F) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after June 3, 2006.”

Section 142(a), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments of (a) and (d) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.71.050.
Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the fifth degree.

Except as authorized in AS 17.30 and AS 17.38, a person commits the crime of misconduct involving a controlled substance in the fifth degree if the person

manufactures or delivers, or possesses with the intent to manufacture or deliver, one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances of an aggregate weight of less than one ounce containing a schedule VIA controlled substance;

[Repealed, § 179 ch 36 SLA 2016.]

fails to make, keep, or furnish any record, notification, order form, statement, invoice, or information required under AS 17.30;

under circumstances not proscribed under AS

11.71.030(a)(3)

,

11.71.040(a)(3)

, or

11.71.040(a)(4)

possesses any amount of a schedule IA, IIA, IIIA, IVA, or VA controlled substance; or

under circumstances not proscribed under AS

11.71.040(a)(4)

, possesses one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances of an aggregate weight of one ounce or more containing a schedule VIA controlled substance.

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the fifth degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 10 ch 146 SLA 1986; am § 8 ch 53 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 22 SLA 2011; am § 2 ch 57 SLA 2012; am §§
47, 179 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 6 ch 13 SLA 2017; am § 53 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intent” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “possess” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “manufacture,” “deliver” — AS

11.71.900

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first through seventh degree — AS

11.71.010

—

11.71.070

Aggregate weight of live marijuana plants — AS

11.71.080

Schedules of controlled substances — AS

11.71.140

—

11.71.190

Excluded defenses — AS

11.71.320

Offenses defined by amounts — AS

11.71.340

Imitation controlled substances — AS 11.73

Original Code Provision — AS 17.10; AS 17.12.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(a)(29), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 29, ch. 13, SLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “fourth” for “fifth”; repealed (a)(2); added (a)(4); in (b), substituted “fourth” for “fifth”; and made stylistic changes

The 2017 amendment, effective June 20, 2017, in (a)(4), substituted “under AS

11.71.030(a)(3)

,

11.71.040(a)(3)

,

11.71.040(a)(4)

, or

11.71.060(a)(2)

” for “under AS

11.71.040(a)(3)

or

11.71.060(a)(2)(B)

”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (a), inserted “and AS 17.38” and substituted “fifth degree” for “fourth degree” in the introductory paragraph, added (a)(5), and made related stylistic changes; and substituted “fifth degree” for “fourth degree” in (b).

Editor's notes. —

Section 22, ch. 53, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendments of subsection (a) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after June 3, 2006.”

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.71.060.
Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the sixth degree.

Except as authorized in AS 17.30 or AS 17.38, a person commits the crime of misconduct involving a controlled substance in the sixth degree if the person

uses or displays any amount of a schedule VIA controlled substance;

possesses one or more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or substances of an aggregate weight of

less than one ounce containing a schedule VIA controlled substance;

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

refuses entry into a premise for an inspection authorized under AS 17.30.

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the sixth degree is a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 11 ch 146 SLA 1986; am 1990 Initiative Proposal No. 2, § 1; am § 9 ch 53 SLA 2006; am § 3 ch 22 SLA 2011; am § 48 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§
54, 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “knowingly,” “possess,” “public place,” “propelled vehicle” — AS

11.81.900

Definition of marijuana — AS

11.71.900

Aggregate weight of live marijuana plants — AS

11.71.080

Schedule VIA controlled substances — AS

11.71.190

Excluded defenses — AS

11.71.320

Imitation controlled substances — AS 11.73

Original Code Provision — AS 17.10; AS 17.12.

Definition of “intent,” “possess,” “public place” — AS

11.81.900

Definition of “manufacture,” “deliver,” “marijuana” — AS

11.71.900

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the first through sixth degree — AS

11.71.010

—

11.71.070

Offenses defined by amounts — AS

11.71.340

For legislative statement of purpose and findings relating to the 2006 amendment of (a) of this section, see §§ 1 and 2, ch. 53, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Revisor's notes. —

In 1991, in the last line of (a)(1) of this section, the word “schedule” was substituted for “scheduled” to correct a manifest error in the 1990 initiative proposal that amended this section.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a) and (b), substituted “fifth degree” for “sixth degree”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (a), inserted “or AS 17.38” and substituted “sixth degree” for “fifth degree” in the introductory paragraph, and repealed (a)(2)(B); and substituted “sixth degree” for “fifth degree” in (b).

Editor's notes. —

Section 22, ch. 53, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendments of subsection (a) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after June 3, 2006.”

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.71.070.
Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the seventh degree. [Repealed effective March 3, 1991, 1990 Initiative Proposal No. 2, § 2.]

Sec. 11.71.080.
Aggregate weight of live marijuana plants.

For purposes of calculating the aggregate weight of a live marijuana plant, the aggregate weight shall be one-sixth of the measured weight of the marijuana plant after the roots of the marijuana plant have been removed.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 10 ch 53 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

Definition of “marijuana” — AS

11.71.900

Misconduct involving a controlled substance in the fourth, fifth, sixth or seventh degree — AS

11.71.040(a)(2)

,

11.71.050(a)(1)

, (2), (3)(E),

11.71.060(a)(1)

, (3), (4),

11.71.070

Original Code Provision — None.

For legislative statement of purpose and findings relating to the 2006 amendment of this section, see §§ 1 and 2, ch. 53, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 22, ch. 53, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendments of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after June 3, 2006.”

Sec. 11.71.090.
Affirmative defense to a prosecution under AS 11.71.030 — 11.71.060; medical use of marijuana.

In a prosecution under AS

11.71.030

—

11.71.060

charging the manufacture, delivery, possession, possession with intent to manufacture or deliver, use, or display of a schedule VIA controlled substance, it is an affirmative defense that the defendant is a patient, or the primary caregiver or alternate caregiver for a patient, and

at the time of the manufacture, delivery, possession, possession with intent to manufacture or deliver, use, or display, the patient was registered under AS 17.37;

the manufacture, delivery, possession, possession with intent to manufacture, deliver, use, or display complied with the requirements of AS 17.37; and

if the defendant is the

primary caregiver of the patient, the defendant was in physical possession of the caregiver registry identification card at the time of the manufacture, delivery, possession, possession with intent to manufacture or deliver, use, or display; or

alternate caregiver of the patient, the defendant was in physical possession of the caregiver registry identification card at the time of the manufacture, delivery, possession, possession with intent to manufacture or deliver, use, or display.

In this section,

“alternate caregiver” has the meaning given in AS

17.37.070

;

“patient” has the meaning given in AS

17.37.070

;

“primary caregiver” has the meaning given in AS 17.37.070.

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 1999)